Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6105HV (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2467 Section 1. Section 35A.13, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. There is appropriated from the general 3 fund of the state to the department for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2026, and each fiscal year thereafter, the 5 sum of sixty-one thousand dollars for one full-time equivalent 6 position to administer grant programs funded by the veterans 7 trust fund. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 35A.23 Service animal training grant 9 program ââ appropriation. 10 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 11 requires: 12 a. âAccredited organizationâ means a service animal training 13 organization that maintains a physical operating location in 14 this state and is accredited by the department pursuant to 15 rules adopted under subsection 6. 16 b. âEligible veteranâ means a resident of this state who 17 is a veteran, as defined in section 35.1, and who meets all 18 eligibility requirements established by the department for 19 participation in the service animal training grant program 20 established under this section. 21 c. âService animal training servicesâ means training, 22 placement, and related services provided by an accredited 23 organization to support an eligible veteranâs use of a service 24 animal that is individually trained to do work or perform tasks 25 for the benefit of the veteran. 26 2. A service animal training grant program is established 27 under the administration and control of the department to 28 award grants to eligible veterans to pay costs associated with 29 service animal training services. 30 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and each 31 fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the 32 veterans trust fund created in section 35A.13 to the department 33 one hundred thousand dollars to award grants under the 34 service animal training grant program and to pay reasonable 35 -1- LSB 6105HV (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 2467 administrative costs of the department associated with the 1 program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated 2 in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 3 the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall be 4 distributed equally among the eligible veterans awarded a grant 5 in that fiscal year. 6 4. In administering the program, the department shall grant 7 up to five thousand dollars to each eligible veteran. An 8 eligible veteran shall not receive more than one grant under 9 this section during the veteranâs lifetime. 10 5. a. An application may be submitted by an eligible 11 veteran, on behalf of an eligible veteran by an accredited 12 organization with the consent of the eligible veteran, or in 13 another manner provided by rule. 14 b. The department shall pay the grant directly to the 15 accredited organization identified in the approved application 16 upon the eligible veteranâs receipt of the service animal. 17 c. An accredited organization shall only use the moneys 18 awarded for the cost of service animal training services for 19 the eligible veteran. 20 d. The department may require an accredited organization 21 to certify the intended use of grant moneys and to provide 22 documentation demonstrating provision of the service animal 23 training services. 24 6. a. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 25 17A to administer this section, including but not limited to 26 rules related to all of the following: 27 (1) Criteria and procedures for accreditation and renewal 28 of accreditation of organizations, including accreditation by 29 assistance dogs international, inc., or a similar organization, 30 minimum training standards, consumer protections, and proof of 31 a physical operating location in this state. 32 (2) Eligibility requirements for veterans, application 33 procedures, prioritization for awarding grants if requests 34 exceed available funding, and procedures to prevent duplicate 35 -2- LSB 6105HV (2) 91 sc/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 2467 grants. 1 (3) Recordkeeping, reporting, compliance monitoring, and 2 remedies for misuse of grant moneys, including recoupment when 3 appropriate. 4 b. The department may establish a one-time fee for 5 accredited organizations to offset administrative costs. The 6 department may also require an organization whose accreditation 7 is revoked to pay a fee for reaccreditation. Fees collected 8 by the department under this paragraph shall be considered 9 appropriated receipts, as defined in section 8.2, and are 10 appropriated to the department for reasonable administrative 11 costs associated with the program. 12 7. The department shall coordinate with county commissions 13 of veteran affairs, county veteran service officers, and other 14 statewide veteran service organizations to conduct outreach and 15 assist eligible veterans with applications. 16